src/morphology/affixes/adjectives.lexc
!! Adjective inflection
!! --------------------
!! The UNDEFINED language adjectives compare.

! TODO: weyn - weynu, weyni?, weynaadaa
! TODO: case on adjectives, yar, yaruna, yaru, dab yaru, qayb yar
	! Sidaas oo kalena carrabku waa qayb yar ... Bal eega dab yaru intuu qoryo shido.

LEXICON IrregularAdjective
dhan+A+Pl:dhammu Clitics "much, many" ; 
xaq+A+Abs:xaqa Clitics "just" ;
xaq+A:xaq Clitics "just" ;
xun+A:xun Clitics "evil" ;
been+A:been Clitics "false" ;
dheer+A:dheer Clitics "tall" ;
badan+A+Attr:bad%^an StatePerson ;
og+A:og StatePerson "know(ing)";
og+A:og Clitics "know(ing)";
eg:ek AdjState ;
eg+A:eg Clitics ;

! TODO: perhaps need to do something else with this.
leh+A+Neg:la'aan Clitics ;
leh+A:leh Clitics ;
leh+A+Nom:lahu Clitics ;

alla+A+Attr:alla Clitics ;
dambe+A+Attr:dambe Clitics ;
dhexaad+A+Attr:dhexaad Clitics ;
dhexe+A+Attr:dhexe Clitics ;
gadaale+A+Attr:gadaale Clitics ;
hoose+A+Attr:hoose Clitics ;
kale+A+Attr:kale Clitics ;
kasta+A+Attr:kasta Clitics ;
keliya+A+Attr:keliya Clitics ;
kore+A+Attr:kore Clitics ;
qalaad+A+Attr:qalaad Clitics ;
sare+A+Attr:sare Clitics ;
shishay+A+Attr:shishay Clitics ;
shishe+A+Attr:shishe Clitics ;
soke+A+Attr:soke Clitics ;
wal+A+Attr:wal Clitics ;
xagge+A+Attr:xagge Clitics ;


kasta+A+Clit/oo+CS:kastoo Clitics ;

LEXICON AdjState
+A: StatePerson ;
+A: AdjMor ;
+A: AdjNom ; 

LEXICON AdjNom
+Nom:u Clitics ;
+Nom:i Clitics ;

! Sometimes orthography includes spaces, e.g. wanaagsan ahay. This will just be handled with copulas elsewhere.

LEXICON StatePerson
:{#} StatePres ; 
:{#} StatePast ; 

! TODO: note that it's not just these -san adjectives that do this, but also other adjectives such as cusúb, which can also take the short forms. Hmmm.

LEXICON StatePres
	StatePresLong ;
	StatePresShort ; 
	StateNeg ;
	StateNegShort ;

	! wanaagsanaado, kululaado, degganaado, etc.
	+V/ah:aa V3A_VerbMorf ;  ! TODO: Is that what this is?


LEXICON StatePresLong
+Pres+1Sg:ahay	  	  FINAL ; 
+Pres+2Sg:tahay        FINAL ; 
+Pres+3SgM:yahay    #; 
+Pres+3SgF:tahay     FINAL ;

+Pres+1PlIncl:nahay     FINAL ;
+Pres+1PlExcl:nahay     FINAL ;
+Pres+2Pl:tihiin	   FINAL ; 
+Pres+3Pl:yihiin       FINAL ; 

LEXICON StatePresShort
+Pres+1Sg:ay	  	  FINAL ; 
+Pres+2Sg:tay        FINAL ; 
+Pres+3SgM:yay    FINAL ; 
+Pres+3SgF:tay     FINAL ;

+Pres+1PlIncl:nay     FINAL ;
+Pres+1PlExcl:nay     FINAL ;
+Pres+2Pl:tiin	   FINAL ; 
+Pres+3Pl:yiin       FINAL ; 

LEXICON StateNeg

+Pres+1Sg+Neg:ihi´	FINAL ;
+Pres+2Sg+Neg:ihi´d	FINAL ;
+Pres+3SgM+Neg:aha´	FINAL ;
+Pres+3SgF+Neg:aha´	FINAL ;
+Pres+1PlIncl+Neg:ihi´n  FINAL ;
+Pres+1PlExcl+Neg:ihi´n  FINAL ;
+Pres+2Pl+Neg:ihidi´n    FINAL ;

+Pres+3Pl+Neg:aha´	FINAL ;


LEXICON StateNegShort

+Pres+1Sg+Neg:i´	FINAL ;
+Pres+2Sg+Neg:i´d	FINAL ;
+Pres+3SgM+Neg:a´	FINAL ;
+Pres+3SgF+Neg:a´	FINAL ;
+Pres+1PlIncl+Neg:i´n  FINAL ;
+Pres+1PlExcl+Neg:i´n  FINAL ;
+Pres+2Pl+Neg:idi´n    FINAL ;
+Pres+3Pl+Neg:a´	FINAL ;


LEXICON StatePast
	StatePastLong ;
	StatePastShort ;

LEXICON StatePastLong
+Past+1Sg:ahaa	  	  FINAL ; 
+Past+2Sg:ahayd        FINAL ; 
+Past+3SgM:ahaa    FINAL ; 
+Past+3SgF:ahayd     FINAL ;

+Past+1PlIncl:ahayn     FINAL ;
+Past+1PlExcl:ahayn     FINAL ;
+Past+2Pl:ahaydeen	   FINAL ; 
+Past+3Pl:ahaayeen       FINAL ;

LEXICON StatePastShort
+Past+1Sg:aa	  	  FINAL ; 
+Past+2Sg:ayd        FINAL ; 
+Past+3SgM:aa    FINAL ; 
+Past+3SgF:ayd     FINAL ;

+Past+1PlIncl:ayn     FINAL ;
+Past+1PlExcl:ayn     FINAL ;
+Past+2Pl:aydeen	   FINAL ; 
+Past+3Pl:aayeen       FINAL ;

! Saeed: òw / òob inchoative
! dhow 'near' / dhowow 'get near; approach'
! http://books.google.com/books?id=gaktTQ8vq28C&pg=PA566&lpg=PA566&dq=ahay+tahay+yahay+nahay+yihiin+tihiin+verb&source=bl&ots=g2t30_f-qh&sig=j61mtnaQIJi6GXLObDYYorNyEog&hl=fi&ei=0kx6TOi4O4KiOLik8bIG&sa=X&oi=book_result&ct=result&resnum=2&ved=0CBwQ6AEwAQ#v=onepage&q=ahay20tahay20yahay20nahay20yihiin20tihiin20verb&f=false


LEXICON AdjBase
+A: AdjMor ;
+A+Inch:oo´b{#} StatePerson ;
+A+Inch:oo´b{#} Progressive ;
+A:o´w FINAL ;

LEXICON AdjMor
Clitics ;


! vim: set ts=4 sw=4 tw=0 syntax=lexc :


! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:
