src/morphology/stems/adjectives.lexc
LEXICON State
  aamisan	AdjState ;
  aammusan	AdjState ;
  aamusan	AdjState ;
  aargudan	AdjState ;
  abaabulan	AdjState ;
  abtirisan	AdjState ;
  adag	AdjState ;
  addeecsan	AdjState ;
  adeecsan	AdjState ;
  adeegsan	AdjState ;
  adkeysan	AdjState ;
  afuufan	AdjState ;
  ajiiban	AdjState ;
  amaran	AdjState ;
  ammaanan	AdjState ;
  aqabsan	AdjState ;
  aqoonsan	AdjState ;
  argaggaxsan	AdjState ;
  asteysan	AdjState ;
  awdan	AdjState ;
  aysan	AdjState ;
  ba'an	AdjState ;
  baabba'san	AdjState ;
  baadhan	AdjState ;
  baahisan	AdjState ;
  baanan	AdjState ;
  baaqsan	AdjState ;
  badisan	AdjState ;
  ballaadhan	AdjState ;
  bandhigan	AdjState ;
  baqan	AdjState ;
  barakeysan	AdjState ;
  bararisan	AdjState ;
  barkaysan	AdjState ;
  bartilmaameedsan	AdjState ;
  baxan	AdjState ;
  beddelan	AdjState ;
  beelan	AdjState ;
  belaayaysan	AdjState ;
  biiran	AdjState ;
  bogsan	AdjState ;
  bojisan	AdjState ;
  burbursan	AdjState ;
  buuran	AdjState ;
  buuxan	AdjState ;
  buuxsan	AdjState ;
  caabudaysan	AdjState ;
  caansan	AdjState ;
  caban	AdjState ;
  cad	AdjState ;
  caddilan	AdjState ;
  cadhosan	AdjState ;
  cagaaran	AdjState ;
  caloolyaysan	AdjState ;
  cararan	AdjState ;
  careysan	AdjState ;
  ceebsan	AdjState ;
  cidan	AdjState ;
  cidhiidhsan	AdjState ;
  ciidan	AdjState ;
  citiqaadsan	AdjState ;
  cudurdaaran	AdjState ;
  cunan	AdjState ;
  daabacan	AdjState ;
  daadisan	AdjState ;
  daahan	AdjState ;
  daahirisan	AdjState ;
  daalacan	AdjState ;
  daaran	AdjState ;
  dabbaalan	AdjState ;
  dadaalan	AdjState ;
  daeiifsan	AdjState ;
  dalan	AdjState ;
  damacsan	AdjState ;
  danan	AdjState ;
  darafkiisan	AdjState ;
  daraysan	AdjState ;
  darreysan	AdjState ;
  dawarisan	AdjState ;
  dedan	AdjState ;
  dedejisan	AdjState ;
  degdegan	AdjState ;
  degdejisan	AdjState ;
  degsan	AdjState ;
  dembaaban	AdjState ;
  dhaafan	AdjState ;
  dhaafsan	AdjState ;
  dhaarisan	AdjState ;
  dhafan	AdjState ;
  dhalaalan	AdjState ;
  dhaliilsan	AdjState ;
  dhankiisan	AdjState ;
  dharan	AdjState ;
  dhawrsan	AdjState ;
  dhaxan	AdjState ;
  dheelan	AdjState ;
  dheeraysan	AdjState ;
  dhegaysan	AdjState ;
  dhegsan	AdjState ;
  dheregan	AdjState ;
  dhexdexeysan	AdjState ;
  dhexhilmaansan	AdjState ;
  dhibaateeysan	AdjState ;
  dhiban	AdjState ;
  dhididsan	AdjState ;
  dhillaysan	AdjState ;
  dhirifsan	AdjState ;
  dhooban	AdjState ;
  dhow	AdjState ;
  dhunsan	AdjState ;
  dhuumaaleeysan	AdjState ;
  diifaysan	AdjState ;
  dilan	AdjState ;
  dildillaacsan	AdjState ;
  diran	AdjState ;
  diyaar	AdjState ;
  doodan	AdjState ;
  doondoonan	AdjState ;
  dooran	AdjState ;
  doorsan	AdjState ;
  dugsan	AdjState ;
  dulaysan	AdjState ;
  dulleysan	AdjState ;
  dunan	AdjState ;
  durduran	AdjState ;
  duuban	AdjState ;
  duulan	AdjState ;
  eedan	AdjState ;
  eedeysan	AdjState ;
  eeysan	AdjState ;
  faa'iidaysan	AdjState ;
  faahfaahsan	AdjState ;
  faaiidaysan	AdjState ;
  facsharan	AdjState ;
  fahamsan	AdjState ;
  falaysan	AdjState ;
  falsan	AdjState ;
  faran	AdjState ;
  faraxan	AdjState ;
  farcanan	AdjState ;
  faruuran	AdjState ;
  fasiran	AdjState ;
  fidisan	AdjState ;
  fiican	AdjState ;
  fiirsan	AdjState ;
  firdhisan	AdjState ;
  firirsan	AdjState ;
  foolxun	AdjState ;
  foororsan	AdjState ;
  fududaysan	AdjState ;
  furfuran	AdjState ;
  fuulan	AdjState ;
  gaaban	AdjState ;
  gaadhan	AdjState ;
  gaajeysan	AdjState ;
  gadan	AdjState ;
  galan	AdjState ;
  galladaysan	AdjState ;
  gargaaran	AdjState ;
  garsooran	AdjState ;
  geddisan	AdjState ;
  geysan	AdjState ;
  go'an	AdjState ;
  godan	AdjState ;
  goobaaban	AdjState ;
  guban	AdjState ;
  gudubsan	AdjState ;
  gumaysan	AdjState ;
  guulaysan	AdjState ;
  guuleysan	AdjState ;
  guurisan	AdjState ;
  haabhaaban	AdjState ;
  habaysan	AdjState ;
  hadan	AdjState ;
  hadduusan	AdjState ;
  hagaagsan	AdjState ;
  hagaansan	AdjState ;
  halaagan	AdjState ;
  halmaansan	AdjState ;
  hamuunsan	AdjState ;
  hanuunisan	AdjState ;
  hareeraysan	AdjState ;
  hareersan	AdjState ;
  harraadisan	AdjState ;
  harsan	AdjState ;
  hassan	AdjState ;
  hayan	AdjState ;
  haysan	AdjState ;
  heenheensan	AdjState ;
  heeysan	AdjState ;
  heysan	AdjState ;
  hodan	AdjState ;
  hoogan	AdjState ;
  hoose	AdjState ;
  huban	AdjState ;
  hubeeysan	AdjState ;
  hubisan	AdjState ;
  hufan	AdjState ;
  hunan	AdjState ;
  hurudan	AdjState ;
  ihaanaysan	AdjState ;
  iibsan	AdjState ;
  imtixaanan	AdjState ;
  inaysan	AdjState ;
  inkaaran	AdjState ;
  inuusan	AdjState ;
  isagoosan	AdjState ;
  iskaraahsan	AdjState ;
  isqaabilsan	AdjState ;
  israacraacsan	AdjState ;
  israaesan	AdjState ;
  istareexsan	AdjState ;
  itaalan	AdjState ;
  jabisan	AdjState ;
  jacayl	AdjState ;
  jaran	AdjState ;
  jecel:jec%^el	AdjState ;
  jeddsan	AdjState ;
  jeedisan	AdjState ;
  jeexan	AdjState ;
  jiidan	AdjState ;
  jiifisan	AdjState ;
  jilcisan	AdjState ;
  jiran	AdjState ;
  jirran	AdjState ;
  jirsan	AdjState ;
  joogsan	AdjState ;
  kaamilsan	AdjState ;
  kacan	AdjState ;
  kaddiban	AdjState ;
  karaahsan	AdjState ;
  karisan	AdjState ;
  kaxaysan	AdjState ;
  keenan	AdjState ;
  khamiirisan	AdjState ;
  kharriban	AdjState ;
  khilaafsan	AdjState ;
  khusuusan	AdjState ;
  kicinsan	AdjState ;
  kooban	AdjState ;
  koran	AdjState ;
  kufisan	AdjState ;
  kulansan	AdjState ;
  kulul	AdjState ;
  kuusan	AdjState ;
  laban	AdjState ;
  laran	AdjState ;
  laydhsan	AdjState ;
  le'an	AdjState ;
  leexsan	AdjState ;
  liibaanisan	AdjState ;
  liican	AdjState ;
  liqan	AdjState ;
  loodsan	AdjState ;
  lufan	AdjState ;
  luudan	AdjState ;
  maadsan	AdjState ;
  maamuusan	AdjState ;
  macaan	AdjState ;
  macaluulisan	AdjState ;
  macluulsan	AdjState ;
  madaxbannaan	AdjState ;
  madow	AdjState ;
  magan	AdjState ;
  mahadnaqan	AdjState ;
  mannaysan	AdjState ;
  maran	AdjState ;
  markaasan	AdjState ;
  maroorsan	AdjState ;
  marsan	AdjState ;
  mashquulisan	AdjState ;
  masqhuulsan	AdjState ;
  mataaneeysan	AdjState ;
  midan	AdjState ;
  mideeysan	AdjState ;
  miiran	AdjState ;
  miisan	AdjState ;
  milicsan	AdjState ;
  miyeysan	AdjState ;
  mudan	AdjState ;
  muddeysan	AdjState ;
  muhiimsan	AdjState ;
  muhuumsan	AdjState ;
  muransan	AdjState ;
  murugsan	AdjState ;
  musuqmaasuqsan	AdjState ;
  nabadgelyaysan	AdjState ;
  nabdaysan	AdjState ;
  nadiifisan	AdjState ;
  nadoocisan	AdjState ;
  naxsan	AdjState ;
  nicmaysan	AdjState ;
  nimcaysan	AdjState ;
  nool:¨nool	AdjState ;
  nuxurleh	AdjState ;
  oodan	AdjState ;
  oofsan	AdjState ;
  oonan	AdjState ;
  ooyan	AdjState ;
  orodan	AdjState ;
  qaabisan	AdjState ;
  qaaran	AdjState ;
  qadan	AdjState ;
  qalabaeysan	AdjState ;
  qalbijaban	AdjState ;
  qallalan	AdjState ;
  qandhaysan	AdjState ;
  qasan	AdjState ;
  qayiran	AdjState ;
  qiran	AdjState ;
  qodan	AdjState ;
  qorshaysan	AdjState ;
  qulubsan	AdjState ;
  quusan	AdjState ;
  raamsan	AdjState ;
  rafaadsan	AdjState ;
  ridan	AdjState ;
  runsan	AdjState ;
  saabisan	AdjState ;
  saaxiiban	AdjState ;
  sahayan	AdjState ;
  saleeysan	AdjState ;
  sarajoogsan	AdjState ;
  shaabadaysan	AdjState ;
  sharraxsan	AdjState ;
  shidan	AdjState ;
  sidaasuusan	AdjState ;
  sinan	AdjState ;
  sooman	AdjState ;
  sujuudsan	AdjState ;
  taabacsan	AdjState ;
  taahan	AdjState ;
  tagsan	AdjState ;
  teetsan	AdjState ;
  tiiran	AdjState ;
  tirsan	AdjState ;
  tuban	AdjState ;
  tuulsan	AdjState ;
  ugaadhsan	AdjState ;
  urisan	AdjState ;
  uunan	AdjState ;
  waalan	AdjState ;
  wadaagan	AdjState ;
  walaacsan	AdjState ;
  wanaajisan	AdjState ;
  waraabsan	AdjState ;
  wareerisan	AdjState ;
  wasakhsan	AdjState ;
  welwelisan	AdjState ;
  weyn	AdjState ;
  xadan	AdjState ;
  xambaaran	AdjState ;
  xanbaarsan	AdjState ;
  xaqsan	AdjState ;
  xasuusan	AdjState ;
  xidhan	AdjState ;
  xiran	AdjState ;
  xoogan	AdjState ;
  xurmaysan	AdjState ;
  yaaban	AdjState ;
  yaqiinsan	AdjState ;
  yeedhan	AdjState ;
